Maryland, session 2026, SB0069.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Economic Development
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *sb0069*

SENATE BILL 69
2.5–110.
(a) There is a nonprofit organizations navigator in the Department.
(b) The Secretary shall designate the navigator.
(c) The navigator shall:
(1) provide technical assistance to nonprofit organizations in obtaining
access to and applying for State grant programs;
(2) work with nonprofit organizations and units of State government to
resolve procedural complexities and delays in State grant–making processes;
(3) collect and share information on opportunities for federal, State, and
local grants with nonprofit organizations; and
(4) represent nonprofit organizations’ interests and concerns as a member
of the Maryland Efficient Grant Application Council established under § 2–209 of the State
Finance and Procurement Article.
Chapter 314 of the Acts of 2025
SECTION 6. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, except as provided in Section
4 of this Act, this Act is an emergency measure, is necessary for the immediate preservation
of the public health or safety, has been passed by a yea and nay vote supported by
three–fifths of all the members elected to each of the two Houses of the General Assembly,
and shall take effect from the date it is enacted. [It shall remain effective through June 30,
2027, and, at the end of June 30, 2027, this Act, with no further action required by the
General Assembly, shall be abrogated and of no further force and effect.]
Chapter 315 of the Acts of 2025
SECTION 6. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, except as provided in Section
4 of this Act, this Act is an emergency measure, is necessary for the immediate preservation
of the public health or safety, has been passed by a yea and nay vote supported by
three–fifths of all the members elected to each of the two Houses of the General Assembly,
and shall take effect from the date it is enacted. [It shall remain effective through June 30,
2027, and, at the end of June 30, 2027, this Act, with no further action required by the
General Assembly, shall be abrogated and of no further force and effect.]
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.